Massachusetts, session 194th, H22.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (a) of section 20C of chapter 32 of the general laws, as appearing
in the 2022 official edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 7, after the fourth “retirement
board” the following: “,provided, however, that no retirement board member shall be required to
file a statement of financial interests for the year in which he or she ceased to be a retirement
board member if he or she served for less than thirty days in such year.”
SECTION 2. Section 20C of chapter 32 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended in line 78 by inserting after the words “section 16.”, the
following: “A board member may petition the commission for a waiver of their removal from the
board and their exclusion from future board service due to extenuating circumstances, provided
that the member files their statement of financial interest by a date set by the commission.”
of 1